test/src/gt-gloss-yamls/VII_D_CNJ_mnopgod_gt-glossing.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  VII - VV - mnopgot :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4
  #neg	obv     prt     dub
     
     #this is pulled from book (p 260)
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     mnopgot+VII+Cnj+0: mnopgok #dg -> k
     mnopgot+VII+Cnj+0+4: mnopgodnig #cons
     #mnopgot+VII+Cnj+0+4: mnopgdnig #book 

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3
     mnopgot+VII+Cnj+0+Prt: mnopgodgiba #cons
     #mnopgot+VII+Cnj+0+Prt: mnopgogba #book
     mnopgot+VII+Cnj+0+4+Prt: mnopgodnigba #cons
     #mnopgot+VII+Cnj+0+4+Prt: mnopodnigba #book

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     PV/CCNJ+mnopgot+VII+Cnj+0+Dub: menpogdogwenh #changed conjunct...
     #mnopgot+VII+Cnj+0+Dub: e-mnopgodgwenh #conservative variant
     #mnopgot+VII+Cnj+0+Dub: e-mnopgogwenh #book variant
     PV/CCNJ+mnopgot+VII+Cnj+0+4+Dub: menpogdin'gwenh #'extrapolated, book has nothing

     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 3, 4
     mnopgot+VII+Cnj+0+Prt+Dub: mnopgodgobne #cons non-changed
     #mnopgot+VII+Cnj+0+Prt+Dub: mnopgodgobane #book non-changed
     #mnopgot+VII+Cnj+0+Prt+Dub: menpogdogbane #changed
     #mnopgot+VII+Cnj+0+Prt+Dub: e-mnopgodgobne #cons variant
     #mnopgot+VII+Cnj+0+Prt+Dub: mnopgogbane #book variant
     mnopgot+VII+Cnj+0+4+Prt+Dub: mnopgodnigbane #cons non-changed
     #mnopgot+VII+Cnj+0+4+Prt+Dub: menpogdin'gobne #'cons changed
     #mnopgot+VII+Cnj+0+4+Prt+Dub: menpogdan'gobne #'book changed
     #mnopgot+VII+Cnj+0+4+Prt+Dub: e-mnopgodnigbane #cons variant
     #mnopgot+VII+Cnj+0+4+Prt+Dub: e-mnopgon'gobne #'book variant

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     mnopgot+VII+Cnj+Neg+0: mnopgosnog 
     mnopgot+VII+Cnj+Neg+0+4: mnopgosnoonig

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     mnopgot+VII+Cnj+Neg+0+Prt: mnopgosnoogba
     mnopgot+VII+Cnj+Neg+0+4+Prt: mnopgosnoon'giba #'

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     PV/CCNJ+mnopgot+VII+Cnj+Neg+0+Dub: menpogsinoogwenh #changed conjunct expected
     #mnopgot+VII+Cnj+Neg+0+Dub: mnopgosnoogwenh #non-changed conjunct book
     PV/CCNJ+mnopgot+VII+Cnj+Neg+0+4+Dub: menpogsinoon'gwenh #'changed conjunct expected
     #mnopgot+VII+Cnj+Neg+0+4+Dub: mnopgosnoon'gwenh #'non-changed conjunct book

     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3, 4
     mnopgot+VII+Cnj+Neg+0+Prt+Dub: mnopgosnoogbane 
     mnopgot+VII+Cnj+Neg+0+4+Prt+Dub: mnopgosnoon'gobne  #'cons
     #mnopgot+VII+Cnj+Neg+0+4+Prt+Dub: mnopgogsinoon'gobne #'book (odd!)
